Utah statutes.
59-12-2203.   Authority to impose a sales and use tax under this part.
(1)  As provided in this Subsection (1), one of the following sales and use
taxes may be imposed within the boundaries of a local taxing jurisdiction:
(a)  a county, city, or town may impose the sales and use tax authorized by
Section 59-12-2213 in accordance with Section 59-12-2213; or
(b)  a city or town may impose the sales and use tax authorized by Section
59-12-2215 in accordance with Section 59-12-2215.
(2)  As provided in this Subsection (2), one of the following sales and use
taxes may be imposed within the boundaries of a local taxing jurisdiction:
(a)  a county, city, or town may impose the sales and use tax authorized by
Section 59-12-2214 in accordance with Section 59-12-2214; or
(b)  a county may impose the sales and use tax authorized by Section
59-12-2216 in accordance with Section 59-12-2216.
(3)  As provided in this Subsection (3), one of the following sales and use
taxes may be imposed within the boundaries of a local taxing jurisdiction:
(a)  a county may impose the sales and use tax authorized by Section
59-12-2217 in accordance with Section 59-12-2217; or
(b)  a county, city, or town may impose the sales and use tax authorized by
Section 59-12-2218 in accordance with Section 59-12-2218.
